data/source/lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 11695 Y 4
SFX 11695 irti yra/548 . 349
SFX 11695 irtis yrasi/548 . 349
SFX 11695 irti irsta/548 . 349
SFX 11695 irtis irstasi/548 . 349

SFX 11705 Y 2
SFX 11705 irti yrie/549 . 349
SFX 11705 irti irstie/549 . 349

SFX 11706 Y 2
SFX 11706 irtis yrie/550 . 349
SFX 11706 irtis irstie/550 . 349

SFX 11727 Y 2
SFX 11727 irti iro/551 . 350
SFX 11727 irtis irosi/551 . 350

SFX 11728 Y 2
SFX 11728 irti iro/552 . 350
SFX 11728 irtis irosi/552 . 350

SFX 11729 Y 2
SFX 11729 irti iro/553 . 350
SFX 11729 irtis irosi/553 . 350

SFX 11733 Y 2
SFX 11733 įsti įsti/530 . 348
SFX 11733 įstis įstis/530 . 348

SFX 11734 Y 2
SFX 11734 įsti įsti/531 . 348
SFX 11734 įstis įstis/531 . 348

SFX 11735 Y 2
SFX 11735 įsti įsti/532 . 348
SFX 11735 įstis įstis/532 . 348

SFX 11736 Y 2
SFX 11736 įsti įsti/533 . 348
SFX 11736 įstis įstis/533 . 348

SFX 11737 Y 2
SFX 11737 įsti įsti/534 . 348
SFX 11737 įstis įstis/534 . 348

SFX 11738 Y 2
SFX 11738 įsti įsti/535 . 348
SFX 11738 įstis įstis/535 . 348

SFX 11739 Y 2
SFX 11739 įsti įsti/536 . 348
SFX 11739 įstis įstis/536 . 348

SFX 11740 Y 2
SFX 11740 įsti įsti/537 . 348
SFX 11740 įstis įstis/537 . 348

SFX 11741 Y 2
SFX 11741 įsti įsti/538 . 348
SFX 11741 įstis įstis/538 . 348

SFX 11742 Y 2
SFX 11742 įsti įsti/539 . 348
SFX 11742 įstis įstis/539 . 348

SFX 11753 Y 2
SFX 11753 įsti inda/540 . 349
SFX 11753 įstis indasi/540 . 349

SFX 11754 Y 2
SFX 11754 įsti inda/541 . 349
SFX 11754 įstis indasi/541 . 349

SFX 11755 Y 2
SFX 11755 įsti inda/542 . 349
SFX 11755 įstis indasi/542 . 349

SFX 11756 Y 2
SFX 11756 įsti inda/543 . 349
SFX 11756 įstis indasi/543 . 349

SFX 11757 Y 2
SFX 11757 įsti inda/544 . 349
SFX 11757 įstis indasi/544 . 349

SFX 11758 Y 2
SFX 11758 įsti inda/545 . 349
SFX 11758 įstis indasi/545 . 349

SFX 11759 Y 2
SFX 11759 įsti inda/546 . 349
SFX 11759 įstis indasi/546 . 349

SFX 11760 Y 2
SFX 11760 įsti inda/547 . 349
SFX 11760 įstis indasi/547 . 349

SFX 11761 Y 2
SFX 11761 įsti inda/548 . 349
SFX 11761 įstis indasi/548 . 349

SFX 11771 Y 1
SFX 11771 įsti indie/549 . 349

SFX 11772 Y 1
SFX 11772 įstis indie/550 . 349

SFX 11773 Y 2
SFX 11773 įsti indo/551 . 350
SFX 11773 įstis indosi/551 . 350

SFX 11774 Y 2
SFX 11774 įsti indo/552 . 350
SFX 11774 įstis indosi/552 . 350

SFX 11775 Y 2
SFX 11775 įsti indo/553 . 350
SFX 11775 įstis indosi/553 . 350

SFX 11779 Y 2
SFX 11779 įsti įsti/530 . 348
SFX 11779 įstis įstis/530 . 348

SFX 11780 Y 2
SFX 11780 įsti įsti/531 . 348
SFX 11780 įstis įstis/531 . 348

SFX 11781 Y 2
SFX 11781 įsti įsti/532 . 348
SFX 11781 įstis įstis/532 . 348

SFX 11782 Y 2
SFX 11782 įsti įsti/533 . 348
SFX 11782 įstis įstis/533 . 348

SFX 11783 Y 2
SFX 11783 įsti įsti/534 . 348
SFX 11783 įstis įstis/534 . 348

SFX 11784 Y 2
SFX 11784 įsti įsti/535 . 348
SFX 11784 įstis įstis/535 . 348

SFX 11785 Y 2
SFX 11785 įsti įsti/536 . 348
SFX 11785 įstis įstis/536 . 348

SFX 11786 Y 2
SFX 11786 įsti įsti/537 . 348
SFX 11786 įstis įstis/537 . 348

SFX 11787 Y 2
SFX 11787 įsti įsti/538 . 348
SFX 11787 įstis įstis/538 . 348

SFX 11788 Y 2
SFX 11788 įsti įsti/539 . 348
SFX 11788 įstis įstis/539 . 348

SFX 11799 Y 2
SFX 11799 įsti indžia/540 . 349
SFX 11799 įstis indžiasi/540 . 349

SFX 11800 Y 2
SFX 11800 įsti indžia/541 . 349
SFX 11800 įstis indžiasi/541 . 349

SFX 11801 Y 2
SFX 11801 įsti indžia/542 . 349
SFX 11801 įstis indžiasi/542 . 349

SFX 11802 Y 2
SFX 11802 įsti indžia/543 . 349
SFX 11802 įstis indžiasi/543 . 349

SFX 11803 Y 2
SFX 11803 įsti indžia/544 . 349
SFX 11803 įstis indžiasi/544 . 349

SFX 11804 Y 2
SFX 11804 įsti indžia/545 . 349
SFX 11804 įstis indžiasi/545 . 349

SFX 11805 Y 2
SFX 11805 įsti indžia/546 . 349
SFX 11805 įstis indžiasi/546 . 349

SFX 11806 Y 2
SFX 11806 įsti indžia/547 . 349
SFX 11806 įstis indžiasi/547 . 349

SFX 11807 Y 2
SFX 11807 įsti indžia/548 . 349
SFX 11807 įstis indžiasi/548 . 349

SFX 11817 Y 1
SFX 11817 įsti indie/549 . 349

SFX 11818 Y 1
SFX 11818 įstis indie/550 . 349

SFX 11819 Y 2
SFX 11819 įsti indė/551 . 350
SFX 11819 įstis indėsi/551 . 350

SFX 11820 Y 2
SFX 11820 įsti indė/552 . 350
SFX 11820 įstis indėsi/552 . 350

SFX 11821 Y 2
SFX 11821 įsti indė/553 . 350
SFX 11821 įstis indėsi/553 . 350

SFX 11825 Y 2
SFX 11825 auti auti/530 . 348
SFX 11825 autis autis/530 . 348

SFX 11826 Y 2
SFX 11826 auti auti/531 . 348
SFX 11826 autis autis/531 . 348

SFX 11827 Y 2
SFX 11827 auti auti/532 . 348
SFX 11827 autis autis/532 . 348

SFX 11828 Y 2
SFX 11828 auti auti/533 . 348
SFX 11828 autis autis/533 . 348

SFX 11829 Y 2
SFX 11829 auti auti/534 . 348
SFX 11829 autis autis/534 . 348

SFX 11830 Y 2
SFX 11830 auti auti/535 . 348
SFX 11830 autis autis/535 . 348

SFX 11831 Y 2
SFX 11831 auti auti/536 . 348
SFX 11831 autis autis/536 . 348

SFX 11832 Y 2
SFX 11832 auti auti/537 . 348
SFX 11832 autis autis/537 . 348

SFX 11833 Y 2
SFX 11833 auti auti/538 . 348
SFX 11833 autis autis/538 . 348

SFX 11834 Y 2
SFX 11834 auti auti/539 . 348
SFX 11834 autis autis/539 . 348

SFX 11845 Y 4
SFX 11845 auti auna/540 . 349
SFX 11845 autis aunasi/540 . 349
SFX 11845 auti auja/540 . 349
SFX 11845 autis aujasi/540 . 349

SFX 11846 Y 4
SFX 11846 auti auna/541 . 349
SFX 11846 autis aunasi/541 . 349
SFX 11846 auti auja/541 . 349
SFX 11846 autis aujasi/541 . 349

SFX 11847 Y 4
SFX 11847 auti auna/542 . 349
SFX 11847 autis aunasi/542 . 349
SFX 11847 auti auja/542 . 349
SFX 11847 autis aujasi/542 . 349

SFX 11848 Y 4
SFX 11848 auti auna/543 . 349
SFX 11848 autis aunasi/543 . 349
SFX 11848 auti auja/543 . 349
SFX 11848 autis aujasi/543 . 349

SFX 11849 Y 4
SFX 11849 auti auna/544 . 349
SFX 11849 autis aunasi/544 . 349
SFX 11849 auti auja/544 . 349
SFX 11849 autis aujasi/544 . 349

SFX 11850 Y 4
SFX 11850 auti auna/545 . 349
SFX 11850 autis aunasi/545 . 349
SFX 11850 auti auja/545 . 349
SFX 11850 autis aujasi/545 . 349

SFX 11851 Y 4
SFX 11851 auti auna/546 . 349
SFX 11851 autis aunasi/546 . 349
SFX 11851 auti auja/546 . 349
SFX 11851 autis aujasi/546 . 349

SFX 11852 Y 4
SFX 11852 auti auna/547 . 349
SFX 11852 autis aunasi/547 . 349
SFX 11852 auti auja/547 . 349
SFX 11852 autis aujasi/547 . 349

SFX 11853 Y 4
SFX 11853 auti auna/548 . 349
SFX 11853 autis aunasi/548 . 349
SFX 11853 auti auja/548 . 349
SFX 11853 autis aujasi/548 . 349

SFX 11863 Y 2
SFX 11863 auti aunie/549 . 349
SFX 11863 auti aujie/549 . 349

SFX 11864 Y 2
SFX 11864 autis aunie/550 . 349
SFX 11864 autis aujie/550 . 349

SFX 11885 Y 2
SFX 11885 auti ovė/551 . 350
SFX 11885 autis ovėsi/551 . 350

SFX 11886 Y 2
SFX 11886 auti ovė/552 . 350
SFX 11886 autis ovėsi/552 . 350

SFX 11887 Y 2
SFX 11887 auti ovė/553 . 350
SFX 11887 autis ovėsi/553 . 350

SFX 11891 Y 2
SFX 11891 esti esti/530 . 348
SFX 11891 estis estis/530 . 348

SFX 11892 Y 2
SFX 11892 esti esti/531 . 348
SFX 11892 estis estis/531 . 348

SFX 11893 Y 2
SFX 11893 esti esti/532 . 348
SFX 11893 estis estis/532 . 348

SFX 11894 Y 2
SFX 11894 esti esti/533 . 348
SFX 11894 estis estis/533 . 348

SFX 11895 Y 2
SFX 11895 esti esti/534 . 348
SFX 11895 estis estis/534 . 348

SFX 11896 Y 2
SFX 11896 esti esti/535 . 348
SFX 11896 estis estis/535 . 348

SFX 11897 Y 2
SFX 11897 esti esti/536 . 348
SFX 11897 estis estis/536 . 348

SFX 11898 Y 2
SFX 11898 esti esti/537 . 348
SFX 11898 estis estis/537 . 348

SFX 11899 Y 2
SFX 11899 esti esti/538 . 348
SFX 11899 estis estis/538 . 348

SFX 11900 Y 2
SFX 11900 esti esti/539 . 348
SFX 11900 estis estis/539 . 348

SFX 11911 Y 2
SFX 11911 esti ęsta/540 . 349
SFX 11911 estis ęstasi/540 . 349

SFX 11912 Y 2
SFX 11912 esti ęsta/541 . 349
SFX 11912 estis ęstasi/541 . 349

SFX 11913 Y 2
SFX 11913 esti ęsta/542 . 349
SFX 11913 estis ęstasi/542 . 349

SFX 11914 Y 2
SFX 11914 esti ęsta/543 . 349
SFX 11914 estis ęstasi/543 . 349

SFX 11915 Y 2
SFX 11915 esti ęsta/544 . 349
SFX 11915 estis ęstasi/544 . 349

SFX 11916 Y 2
SFX 11916 esti ęsta/545 . 349
SFX 11916 estis ęstasi/545 . 349

SFX 11917 Y 2
SFX 11917 esti ęsta/546 . 349
SFX 11917 estis ęstasi/546 . 349

SFX 11918 Y 2
SFX 11918 esti ęsta/547 . 349
SFX 11918 estis ęstasi/547 . 349

SFX 11919 Y 2
SFX 11919 esti ęsta/548 . 349
SFX 11919 estis ęstasi/548 . 349

SFX 11929 Y 1
SFX 11929 esti ęstie/549 . 349

SFX 11930 Y 1
SFX 11930 estis ęstie/550 . 349

SFX 11931 Y 2
SFX 11931 esti eso/551 . 350
SFX 11931 estis esosi/551 . 350

SFX 11932 Y 2
SFX 11932 esti eso/552 . 350
SFX 11932 estis esosi/552 . 350

SFX 11933 Y 2
SFX 11933 esti eso/553 . 350
SFX 11933 estis esosi/553 . 350

SFX 11937 Y 2
SFX 11937 ešti ešti/530 . 348
SFX 11937 eštis eštis/530 . 348

SFX 11938 Y 2
SFX 11938 ešti ešti/531 . 348
SFX 11938 eštis eštis/531 . 348

SFX 11939 Y 2
SFX 11939 ešti ešti/532 . 348
SFX 11939 eštis eštis/532 . 348

SFX 11940 Y 2
SFX 11940 ešti ešti/533 . 348
SFX 11940 eštis eštis/533 . 348

SFX 11941 Y 2
SFX 11941 ešti ešti/534 . 348
SFX 11941 eštis eštis/534 . 348

SFX 11942 Y 2
SFX 11942 ešti ešti/535 . 348
SFX 11942 eštis eštis/535 . 348

SFX 11943 Y 2
SFX 11943 ešti ešti/536 . 348
SFX 11943 eštis eštis/536 . 348

SFX 11944 Y 2
SFX 11944 ešti ešti/537 . 348
SFX 11944 eštis eštis/537 . 348

SFX 11945 Y 2
SFX 11945 ešti ešti/538 . 348
SFX 11945 eštis eštis/538 . 348

SFX 11946 Y 2
SFX 11946 ešti ešti/539 . 348
SFX 11946 eštis eštis/539 . 348

SFX 11957 Y 2
SFX 11957 ešti ęšta/540 . 349
SFX 11957 eštis ęštasi/540 . 349

SFX 11958 Y 2
SFX 11958 ešti ęšta/541 . 349
SFX 11958 eštis ęštasi/541 . 349

SFX 11959 Y 2
SFX 11959 ešti ęšta/542 . 349
SFX 11959 eštis ęštasi/542 . 349

SFX 11960 Y 2
SFX 11960 ešti ęšta/543 . 349
SFX 11960 eštis ęštasi/543 . 349

SFX 11961 Y 2
SFX 11961 ešti ęšta/544 . 349
SFX 11961 eštis ęštasi/544 . 349

SFX 11962 Y 2
SFX 11962 ešti ęšta/545 . 349
SFX 11962 eštis ęštasi/545 . 349

SFX 11963 Y 2
SFX 11963 ešti ęšta/546 . 349
SFX 11963 eštis ęštasi/546 . 349

SFX 11964 Y 2
SFX 11964 ešti ęšta/547 . 349
SFX 11964 eštis ęštasi/547 . 349

SFX 11965 Y 2
SFX 11965 ešti ęšta/548 . 349
SFX 11965 eštis ęštasi/548 . 349

SFX 11975 Y 1
SFX 11975 ešti ęštie/549 . 349

SFX 11976 Y 1
SFX 11976 eštis ęštie/550 . 349

SFX 11977 Y 2
SFX 11977 ešti ešo/551 . 350
SFX 11977 eštis ešosi/551 . 350

SFX 11978 Y 2
SFX 11978 ešti ešo/552 . 350
SFX 11978 eštis ešosi/552 . 350

SFX 11979 Y 2
SFX 11979 ešti ešo/553 . 350
SFX 11979 eštis ešosi/553 . 350

SFX 11983 Y 2
SFX 11983 ilti ilti/530 . 348
SFX 11983 iltis iltis/530 . 348

SFX 11984 Y 2
SFX 11984 ilti ilti/531 . 348
SFX 11984 iltis iltis/531 . 348

SFX 11985 Y 2
SFX 11985 ilti ilti/532 . 348
SFX 11985 iltis iltis/532 . 348

SFX 11986 Y 2
SFX 11986 ilti ilti/533 . 348
SFX 11986 iltis iltis/533 . 348

SFX 11987 Y 2
SFX 11987 ilti ilti/534 . 348
SFX 11987 iltis iltis/534 . 348

SFX 11988 Y 2
SFX 11988 ilti ilti/535 . 348
SFX 11988 iltis iltis/535 . 348

SFX 11989 Y 2
SFX 11989 ilti ilti/536 . 348
SFX 11989 iltis iltis/536 . 348

SFX 11990 Y 2
SFX 11990 ilti ilti/537 . 348
SFX 11990 iltis iltis/537 . 348

SFX 11991 Y 2
SFX 11991 ilti ilti/538 . 348
SFX 11991 iltis iltis/538 . 348

SFX 11992 Y 2
SFX 11992 ilti ilti/539 . 348
SFX 11992 iltis iltis/539 . 348

SFX 12003 Y 4
SFX 12003 ilti yla/540 . 349
SFX 12003 iltis ylasi/540 . 349
SFX 12003 ilti ilsta/540 . 349
SFX 12003 iltis ilstasi/540 . 349

SFX 12004 Y 4
SFX 12004 ilti yla/541 . 349
SFX 12004 iltis ylasi/541 . 349
SFX 12004 ilti ilsta/541 . 349
SFX 12004 iltis ilstasi/541 . 349

SFX 12005 Y 4
SFX 12005 ilti yla/542 . 349
SFX 12005 iltis ylasi/542 . 349
SFX 12005 ilti ilsta/542 . 349
SFX 12005 iltis ilstasi/542 . 349

SFX 12006 Y 4
SFX 12006 ilti yla/543 . 349
SFX 12006 iltis ylasi/543 . 349
SFX 12006 ilti ilsta/543 . 349
SFX 12006 iltis ilstasi/543 . 349

SFX 12007 Y 4
SFX 12007 ilti yla/544 . 349
SFX 12007 iltis ylasi/544 . 349
SFX 12007 ilti ilsta/544 . 349
SFX 12007 iltis ilstasi/544 . 349

SFX 12008 Y 4
SFX 12008 ilti yla/545 . 349
SFX 12008 iltis ylasi/545 . 349
SFX 12008 ilti ilsta/545 . 349
SFX 12008 iltis ilstasi/545 . 349

SFX 12009 Y 4
SFX 12009 ilti yla/546 . 349
SFX 12009 iltis ylasi/546 . 349
SFX 12009 ilti ilsta/546 . 349
SFX 12009 iltis ilstasi/546 . 349
